Utah statutes.
53A-3-302.   Business administrator -- Term -- Oath and bond.

(1)  Each board shall appoint a business administrator.

(2)  The business administrator's term of office is for two years and until a successor is appointed and qualified.

(3)  If it becomes necessary to appoint an interim business manager due to a vacancy in the office of business administrator, then the board shall make an appointment during a public meeting for an indefinite term not to exceed one year, which term shall end upon the appointment and qualification of a new business manager.

(4)  The business administrator qualifies for office by taking the constitutional oath of office and by posting any required bond or undertaking.

